nl: Melasse kwaliteit: Blackstrap; Donker; Licht; Stroop; Overig
sv: Melassgrad: Blackstrap; Mörk; Ljus; Treacle; Annan
zh-TW: 糖蜜等級: 黑糖蜜; 深色; 淺色; 糖漿; 其他
es: Grado de melaza: Blackstrap; Oscura; Clara; Melaza clara (treacle); Otro
pt-PT: Grau de melaço: Blackstrap; Escuro; Claro; Xarope de melaço; Outro
fi: Melassilaatu: Blackstrap; Tumma; Vaalea; Siirappi; Muu
lt-LT: Melasos klasė: Melasa; Tamsi; Šviesi; Sirupas; Kita
da: Melassekvalitet: Blackstrap; Mørk; Lys; Mørk sirup (treacle); Andet
el: Βαθμός ποιότητας μελάσας: Blackstrap; Σκούρα; Ανοιχτόχρωμη; Τρέακλ (Treacle); Άλλο
sk-SK: Trieda melasy: Blackstrap; Tmavá; Svetlá; Sirup; Iné
ro-RO: Grad melasă: Melasă de final; Închis; Deschis; Sirop; Altele
vi: Phân loại mật đường: Mật rỉ blackstrap; Đậm; Nhạt; Mật treacle; Khác
hu: Melasz minősége: Blackstrap; Sötét; Világos; Melasz (szirup); Egyéb
cs: Jakost melasy: Blackstrap; Tmavá; Světlá; Sirup (Treacle); Jiné
it: Grado della melassa: Melassa nera; Scura; Chiara; Treacle; Altro
zh-CN: 糖蜜等级: 黑糖蜜; 深色; 浅色; 糖蜜; 其他
ja: 糖蜜等級: 廃糖蜜 (ブラックストラップ); ダーク; ライト; 糖蜜 (トリークル); その他
pl: Klasa melasy: Blackstrap (czarna melasa); Ciemna; Jasna; Melasa (Treacle); Inna
fr: Grade de mélasse: Mélasses noires; Foncée; Claire; Mélasse; Autre
th: เกรดของกากน้ำตาล: แบล็กสแตรป; ดำ; ใส; ทรีเคิล; อื่นๆ
de: Qualitätsstufe der Melasse: Blackstrap; Dunkel; Hell; Treacle; Sonstige
ko: 당밀 등급: 블랙스트랩; 다크; 라이트; 트레클; 기타
tr: Pekmez sınıfı: Kara pekmez; Koyu; Açık renkli; Şeker pekmezi; Diğer
pt-BR: Melaço classificação: Melaço escuro (Blackstrap); Escuro; Claro; Melaço refinado (Treacle); Outro
hr-HR: Kvaliteta melase: Blackstrap; Tamna; Svijetla; Treacle; Ostalo
sl-SI: Razred (kakovost) melase: Melasa (blackstrap); Temna melasa; Svetla melasa; Sirup (treacle); Drugo
nb: Melassekvalitet: Blackstrap; Mørk; Lys; Treacle (sirup); Annet
en: Molasses grade: Blackstrap; Dark; Light; Treacle; Other
bg-BG: Клас меласа: Черна меласа (Blackstrap); Тъмна; Светла; Светла меласа (Treacle); Друго
ru: Сорт патоки: Блэкстрэп (меласса); Темная; Светлая; Трикл (патока); Другое